Hawaii statutes.
§103D-903 Duties of the chief procurement
officer. (a) The chief procurement officer may coordinate the
implementation of this part with any similar programs offered by the department
of business, economic development, and tourism or any other governmental body.

(b) The chief procurement officer may provide
staff to provide service to designated state agencies to assist small
businesses in learning how to do business with the State.

(c) In carrying out this part, the chief
procurement officer may:

(1) Give special publicity to procurement procedures
and issue special publications designed to assist small businesses in learning
how to do business with the State;

(2) Compile, maintain, and make available source
lists of small businesses for the purpose of encouraging procurement from small
business;

(3) Include small businesses on solicitation mailing
lists;

(4) Develop and conduct training programs to assist
small businesses;

(5) Reduce the level or change the types of bonding
normally required or accept alternative forms of security;

(6) Make special provisions for progress payments;

(7) Establish the goal that twenty per cent of the
State's annual purchasing expenditure be awarded to small business; and

(8) Impose mandatory evaluation criteria designed to
encourage the use of small business as subcontractors on large contracts not
susceptible to performance by small business. [L Sp 1993, c 8, pt of §2; am L
2005, c 50, §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next